Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2204
Attorney General; legal advisor to
commission; Auditor of Public Accounts; books; audit annually.

(1) The Attorney General shall serve as legal advisor to the commission
and, to assist him or her in
the performance of his or her duties
as such, may authorize the commission to employ special bond counsel.

(2) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall audit the books of the commission at such time
as he or she determines necessary.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 4, p. 1108;

Laws 2011, LB337, § 2.